Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.300

Residential mortgage loan servicer—Liquidity, operating reserves, tangible net worth requirements.

(1) A residential mortgage loan servicer licensee must maintain liquidity, operating reserves, and a tangible net worth in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles as determined by the director. The director may adopt rules to interpret this subsection.

(2) A residential mortgage loan servicer that is a Fannie Mae or Freddie Mac-approved servicer meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section if the liquidity, operating reserves, and tangible net worth each meet the standards of the government-sponsored enterprise for which they are approved. For loans serviced that would not otherwise be subject to the liquidity, operating reserves, and tangible net worth requirements of Fannie Mae or Freddie Mac, the residential mortgage loan servicer must maintain liquidity, operating reserves, and tangible net worth consistent with the highest standards of the government-sponsored entity or entities for which they are approved.

(3) If a licensee's liquidity, operating reserves, or tangible net worth fall below the amount required under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the director or the director's designee may initiate an action.

[ 2015 c 229 s 25.]